Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20143-313
Zoning regulations;
permit or variance; hazard marking and lighting.

In
granting any permit under or
variance from
any airport zoning regulation adopted under the Airport Zoning Act, the
administrative agency or board of adjustment may, if it deems it advisable
to effectuate the purposes of the
act and reasonable in the circumstances, so condition such permit
or variance as to require the owner of the structure or tree in question to
permit the political subdivision, at its own expense, to install, operate, and maintain thereon such
markers and lights as may be necessary to indicate to flyers the presence
of an airport hazard.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 7(3), p. 686;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 13.